Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 16-200 of Title 26, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any campaign or election material that is not an official
government document from a county election board, the State Election
Board, or a subdivision of this state sent via mail to voters shall
include a disclaimer. The disclaimer shall clarify, in a minimum of
size fourteen (14) font, the following:
"This piece of mail is not an official government document from
the State of Oklahoma or any subdivision of this state."

Req. No. 11123 Page 1

For purposes of this section, campaign or election material
includes mail encouraging voters to apply for an absentee ballot or
reminding them of election dates.
B. Any person or organization that does not include the
disclaimer described in subsection A of this section shall be
subject to a one-hundred-dollar fine per mailer campaign, meaning a
unique mailer sent to multiple addresses. "Per mailer campaign"
shall not mean individual pieces of mail sent. On the third offense
of failing to include the disclaimer described in subsection A of
this section, the fine shall increase to a three-hundred-dollar fine
per mailer campaign.
C. The Oklahoma Ethics Commission shall enforce this section
and be granted rule-making authority to carry out its provisions.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11123 MJ 01/15/25








Req. No. 11123 Page 2